Tennessee, session 114, HB0826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 36, Chapter 8, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
The administrative office of the courts shall submit an annual report by January
15 of each year to the governor, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house
of representatives detailing the number of actions brought in the courts of this state for
which a violation of this chapter was asserted as a claim or a defense; whether the
plaintiff was successful in asserting the claim or the defendant was successful in
asserting the defense, as applicable; and the person or entity, if any, found in violation of
this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0826
003002
- 1 -